Tennessee, session 114, SB1314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-38-507(a), is amended by
deleting "as a pilot program".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-38-507(d), is amended by
deleting the subsection.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1314
000923
- 1 -